Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 2. Local Sales Tax

§ 39-15-201.
Definitions.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

Definitions under article 1 of this chapter shall apply to this article unless otherwise specified.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a), which read: "`This article' means W.S.

39-15-201

through

39-15-211

."

§ 39-15-202.
Administration.

The state preempts the field of imposing tax upon retail sales of tangible personal property, admissions and services as provided by this article and no county, city, town or other political subdivision may impose, levy or collect taxes upon retail sales, admissions and services except as provided in this article.

In addition to the state tax imposed under article 1 of this chapter a county, city, town or resort district may impose excise taxes as specified under this article.

The administration of the county, city, town or resort district sales taxes is vested in the department which may prescribe forms and rules and regulations for making returns and for the ascertainment, assessment and collection of the taxes. The department shall keep complete records of all monies received and disbursed by it.

No applicant to the state of Wyoming for grant or loan funds shall be penalized for failure to enact the tax provided in W.S. 39-15-204(a)(iii).

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2003, ch. 72, § 2.